Massachusetts, session 194th, S1275.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 271 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 22B the
following section:-
Section 22C. (a) For purposes of this section, the term “recreational games" shall mean
any card game or game of chance, including but not limited to, poker, pinochle, bridge, rummy,
canasta, hearts, dominos, cribbage, and any type of recreational bingo in which:
(i) the winnings of any player in a single game or session does not exceed $20;
(ii) the amount of money contributed by a single player during the entire session is $5 or
less;
(iii) all money wagered on the game is distributed to the players by the end of the session;
of 2

(iv) all players are natural persons who attend and compete in the game, in person, as a
contestant or bettor on equal terms with the other players therein without receiving or becoming
entitled to receive something of value or any profit therefrom other than his or her personal
winnings from the game; and
(v) no person receives or becomes entitled to receive any profit, outside the winnings of a
player, for the arrangement or facilitation of the game or permitting the use of premises for the
game;
(vi) the provisions of Section 22C of chapter 271 shall only apply to said recreational
games taking place at municipal and town senior centers in the commonwealth.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the prosecution, arrest or conviction of any
person for hosting or playing in a recreational game in a public or private setting; provided,
however, private establishments may refuse to permit the playing of such recreational games.
of 2